Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [326B.441] NATURAL GAS BAN; PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin A political subdivision must not adopt local regulations prohibiting the use of natural gas as an energy source in a residential unit after July 1, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end